California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) The Controller and any officer, employee, or agent, or former officer, employee, or agent, of the Controller shall not disclose or use any information obtained from the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section except for the purpose of making payments pursuant to Section 8150, 8150.2, or 8161 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 51, Sec. 4.   (AB 192)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19554.2.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 19542, subject to the limitations of this section and federal law, the Franchise Tax Board may disclose to any third-party vendor with an existing contract for services relating to the distribution of payments to “qualified recipients,” as defined in Section 8161 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, return or return information, including identifying information, that the Franchise Tax Board determines is necessary for the third-party vendor to provide services relating to the distribution of payments to “qualified recipients” pursuant to Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 8160) of Division 8 of Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) For purposes of this section, “existing contract for
 services relating to the distribution of payments” means the contract for services entered into pursuant to Section 8163 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) (1) The information provided to a third-party vendor under this section is subject to Section 19542.

(2) Any third-party vendor and any officer, employee, or agent, or former officer, employee, or agent, of a third-party vendor shall not disclose or use any information obtained from the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section except for the purpose of providing services relating to the distribution of payments pursuant to Section 8161 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 51, Sec. 5.   (AB 192)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19555.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Health Care Services shall inform the Franchise Tax Board of the names and social security numbers of applicants for, or recipients of, public social services programs under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board, upon receipt of this information, may inform the departments of any such applicant or recipient who received unearned income within the most recent available tax year, as reflected on magnetic tape information returns supplied to the Franchise Tax Board by payers, or on the magnetic tape prepared by the Franchise Tax Board which reflects paper information returns supplied to the Franchise Tax Board by payers. In addition, the Franchise Tax Board may provide, from those sources, the departments with the payee’s name, social security number, and address; the payer’s name and federal employer identification number, including branch code numbers, if applicable, and address; the dollar amount and type of unearned income; and any identifying account numbers.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board shall return all information received from the departments after completing the exchange of information.

(d) This section shall be implemented only to the extent it is funded in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 165.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

19556.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may disclose to persons described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, tax return and return information solely for use in an action or proceeding affecting the personnel rights of an employee or former employee, or in preparation of the action or proceeding, but only to the extent the Franchise Tax Board determines that the return or return information is, or may be, relevant and material to the action or proceeding. Tax return and return information may be disclosed pursuant to this section to any of the
 following persons:

(1) An employee or former employee of the Franchise Tax Board who is, or may be, a party to an administrative action or proceeding affecting the personnel rights of that employee or former employee.

(2) Upon written request by the employee or former employee, to the employee’s or former employee’s duly authorized legal representative.

(3) Officers and employees of the Franchise Tax Board for use in any action or proceeding affecting the rights of an employee or former employee, to the extent necessary to advance or protect the interests of the State of California.

(4) An administrative law judge, administrative board member, judge, or justice, or authorized officer or employee thereof, in connection with an administrative hearing,
 adjudication, or appeal thereof, related to an action or proceeding affecting the personnel rights of an employee or former employee.

(b) For purposes of this section, an action or proceeding affecting the personnel rights of an employee or former employee of the Franchise Tax Board means an action proceeding arising under either of the following:

(1) The State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of the Government Code).

(2) The Ralph C. Dills Act (Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 3512) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(c) Any unauthorized disclosure by a person described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of any tax return or return information disclosed to that person
 pursuant to this section shall be subject to criminal penalty and civil liability under this part for that unauthorized disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 920, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19557.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the California Student Aid Commission may annually inform the Franchise Tax Board of the names and social security numbers of the following persons who have, as part of the Student Aid Application for California, signed an authorization in a form and manner mutually agreeable to the Franchise Tax Board and the California Student Aid Commission for the release by the Franchise Tax Board of tax information to the California Student Aid Commission:

(1) All applicants for, or recipients of, student financial aid.

(2) Parents of dependent applicants for, or recipients of, student financial aid.

(3) Spouses of applicants for, or recipients of, student financial aid.

(b) The California Student Aid Commission shall submit the names and social security numbers as authorized in subdivision (a) in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) Upon receipt of this information, the Franchise Tax Board may provide the California Student Aid Commission, from state tax returns of individuals described in subdivision (a), their California adjusted gross income and the California income adjustments as are necessary to calculate their
 federal adjusted gross income, or any other information from their state tax return, that can be provided by the Franchise Tax Board through its automated process, that the California Student Aid Commission needs to administer the program for which the authorization was given.

(d) All versions of the Student Aid Application for California shall include the authorization described in subdivision (a). The Franchise Tax Board may from time to time audit these authorizations. All processors of the Student Aid Application for California shall provide the Franchise Tax Board with access to any records necessary for completing these audits. The Franchise Tax Board shall report all audit findings to the California Student Aid Commission.

(e) Any unwarranted disclosure or use of the tax information described in subdivision (c) by the California Student Aid Commission, or its employees and
 officers thereof, is a misdemeanor as provided in Section 19552.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19558.

(a) Subject to the limitations of this section and federal law, the Franchise Tax Board may provide the Public Employees’ Retirement System with the names and addresses or other identification or location information from income tax returns or other records required under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or this part, for both of the following:

(1) Solely for the purposes of disbursing unclaimed benefits pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 21250) and Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 21490) of Part 3 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code and distributing member statements on an annual basis.

(2) Until June 30, 2016, solely for the purpose of filing required data pursuant to the Early Retiree Reinsurance Program (Sec. 1102, Public Law 111-148; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 18002), Part 149 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and related departmental directives.

(b) Neither the Public Employees’ Retirement System, nor its agents, nor any of its current or former officers or employees, shall disclose or use any information obtained pursuant to this section except as provided in this section. Any disclosure not authorized by this section is a
 misdemeanor.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board may from time to time review the use of information provided to the Public Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to this section and the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall provide the Franchise Tax Board with access for that purpose. The reviews shall be limited to ensuring that the Public Employees’ Retirement System uses the information provided by the Franchise Tax Board only in the manner specified in subdivision (a). The Franchise Tax Board shall report all findings to the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 719, Sec. 56.   (SB 856)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

19560.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide the Wildlife Conservation Board, within a reasonable time, information on the amount of the tax credit claimed under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 37030) of Division 28 of the Public Resources Code, with respect to each qualified contribution, as described in Section 17053.30 or 23630, that is claimed during that year, and any other information the Wildlife Conservation Board requires to correctly allocate the credit to the appropriate bond fund section, appropriation, department, and, if
 applicable, the related local government.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board shall not provide the Wildlife Conservation Board information pursuant to subdivision (a) if providing that information would disclose tax return information of a taxpayer, unless the taxpayer has consented to that disclosure pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 37034 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 715, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19560.5.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to effectuate the Financial Institution Record Match System prescribed under Section 19266, the Franchise Tax Board may disclose the name and social security number or taxpayer identification number to designated financial institutions or their authorized processing agent for purposes of matching debtor records to accountholder records at the financial institution. Any use of the data provided by the Franchise Tax Board for a purpose other
 than those identified by Section 19266 is prohibited and considered a violation of Section 19542.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 14, Sec. 8.   (SB 86)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19561.

(a) Notwithstanding any other section of law, the Franchise Tax Board may charge a fee for providing persons with copies of their tax returns. The fee shall include the costs of handling requests, copying documents, and postage.

(b) Fees received under this section shall be handled in accordance with Section 19605.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19562.

Whenever under this part or any act heretofore or hereafter enacted, the Franchise Tax Board is required or permitted to disclose information, to furnish abstracts, or to permit access to its records, to or by any official, department, bureau, or agency of this state (including its political subdivisions), or any other state, or the United States, it may charge the official, department, bureau, or agency for the reasonable cost of its services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19563.

This article does not prohibit the publication of statistics, so classified as to prevent the identification of particular reports or returns and the items thereof, or the publication of the percentage of dividends paid by any corporation that is deductible by the recipient under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19564.

The Franchise Tax Board shall publish on or before December 31, 1978, and each December 31 thereafter, information on the amount of tax paid by individual taxpayers with high total incomes. Total income for this purpose is to be calculated and set forth by adding to adjusted gross income any items of tax preference excluded from, or deducted in arriving at, adjusted gross income, and by subtracting any investment expenses incurred in the production of that income to the extent of the investment income.

These data are to include the number of those individuals with total income over two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) who owe no state income tax (after credits) and the deductions, exclusions, or credits used by them to avoid tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19565.

(a) (1) If an organization is exempt from taxation under Section 23701 for any taxable year, the application filed by the organization with respect to which the Franchise Tax Board made its determination that the organization was entitled to exemption under Section 23701, together with any papers submitted in support of the application, any letter or other document issued by the
 Franchise Tax Board, with respect to the application, and any copy of the notification issued by the Internal Revenue Service approving the organization’s tax-exempt status pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code which is submitted by the organization to the Franchise Tax Board, shall be open to public inspection. After the application of any organization has been opened to public inspection under this subdivision, the Franchise Tax Board shall, on the request of any person with respect to the organization, furnish a statement indicating the section which it has been determined describes the organization.

(2) Any inspection under paragraph (1) may be made at times, and in the manner, as the Franchise Tax Board shall by regulation prescribe.

(b) Upon request of the organization submitting any supporting papers described in subdivision (a), the Franchise Tax Board shall withhold from
 public inspection any information contained therein which it determines relates to any trade secret, patent, process, style of work, or apparatus, of the organization, if it determines that public disclosure of the information would adversely affect the organization. The Franchise Tax Board shall withhold from public inspection any information contained in supporting papers described in subdivision (a) the public disclosure of which it determines would adversely affect the national defense.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board may impose a reasonable charge for supplying any information the disclosure of which is permitted under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 536, Sec. 2.   (AB 1173)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19566.

Any information provided to or secured by the Franchise Tax Board for purposes of administering Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) may be used by Franchise Tax Board for purposes of administering Section 10878 or Article 6 (commencing with Section 19280) of Chapter 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1242, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19567.

Notwithstanding Section 19542, the Franchise Tax Board may disclose information to the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board to facilitate the collection of amounts due pursuant to Section 19286 or Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Government Code and the appeals of the determination of the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board in a final notice of penalty application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 21, Sec. 16.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

19570.

The provisions of Sections 1798.35, 1798.36, 1798.37, and Article 9 (commencing with Section 1798.45) of Chapter 1 of Title 1.8 of the Civil Code shall not be applied, directly or indirectly, to the determination of the existence or possible existence of liability (or the amount thereof) of any person for any tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or other imposition or offense to which the provisions of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 694, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19571.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may disclose to state governmental licensing entities identifying information of persons appearing on the list of 500 largest tax delinquencies pursuant to Section 19195 for purposes of administering Section 494.5 of the Business and Professions Code. “Identifying information” means the name, social security number or taxpayer identification number, and the last known address of the persons appearing on the list of the 500 largest tax
 delinquencies.

(b) Neither the state governmental licensing entity, nor any officer, employee, or agent, or former officer, employee, or agent of a state governmental licensing entity, may disclose or use any information obtained from the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section, except to administer Section 494.5 of the Business and Professions Code or to inform the public of the denial, refusal to renew, or suspension of a license or the issuance of a temporary license pursuant to Section 494.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, state governmental licensing entity means a state governmental licensing entity as defined in Section 494.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 455, Sec. 15.   (AB 1424)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19572.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may disclose to state agencies identifying information of persons appearing on the list of the 500 largest tax delinquencies pursuant to Section 19195 for purposes of administering Section 10295.4 of the Public Contract Code. “Identifying information” means the name, social security number or taxpayer identification number, and the last known address of the persons appearing on the list of the 500 largest tax delinquencies.

(b) A state agency, and any officer, employee, or agent, or former officer, employee, or agent of a state agency, shall not disclose or use any information obtained from the Franchise Tax Board, pursuant to this section, except to administer Section 10295.4 of Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 455, Sec. 16.   (AB 1424)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19572.5.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2026, notwithstanding Section 19542, the Franchise Tax Board shall annually provide to Donate Life California all of the following information from every resident income tax return that provides the individual’s written consent to enroll in the Donate Life California Organ and Tissue Donor Registry and to share the
 individual’s information with Donate Life California for purposes of that registry, as described in Section 18544:

(1) The individual’s name.

(2) The individual’s address.

(3) The individual’s date of birth.

(4) The last four digits of the individual’s social security number.

(b) Donate Life California shall use the information received from the Franchise Tax Board, as described in paragraph (1), only for purposes of administering the Donate Life California Organ and Tissue Donor Registry.

(c) Donate Life California shall add individuals consenting to enrollment in the Donate Life California Organ and Tissue Donor Registry pursuant to Section 18544 to that registry within 30 days of receiving the individual’s information from the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) By January 1, 2025, the Franchise Tax Board and Donate Life California shall enter into a data sharing agreement that is consistent with this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, “Donate Life California” means the nonprofit organization established and designated as the California Organ and Tissue Donor Registrar pursuant to Section 7150.90 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.   (AB 1268)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Tax Forms [19581. - 19586.]

19581.

In enacting the California Personal Income Tax Fairness, Simplification, and Conformity Act of 1987, the Legislature finds and declares that for most taxpayers in most ordinary circumstances, the burden of preparing tax returns could be greatly reduced by the availability of state tax forms which would allow taxpayers to copy numbers from the federal return, make simple adjustments, look up the tax in published tax tables, subtract state tax credits, and either pay the amount due or file for a refund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19582.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, the Franchise Tax Board shall make available to taxpayers tax forms that are as simple as possible for taxpayers to prepare. These forms shall be designed to provide for taxpayers to copy figures from, or attach a copy of, their federal return or portions thereof, or both, and to make any necessary adjustments.

The Franchise Tax Board shall, in preparing tax forms, make every effort to ease taxpayers’ compliance burden, including, but
 not limited to, (a) designing forms so that, to the maximum extent possible, items already entered on the federal return may be copied to the state form, (b) reducing the number of state schedules by attaching copies of comparable federal schedules to the state return, where appropriate, and (c) choosing a weight and quality of paper, color of ink, and general form design which will facilitate the preparation of returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19582.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a taxpayer filing as either a single taxpayer or as a head of household whose total income for the taxable year is one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less, and taxpayers filing a joint return or a taxpayer filing as a qualifying widow or widower whose total income is two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or less, shall have the option to use Form 540 2EZ, or its successor form, as prepared by the Franchise Tax Board, to reflect the provisions of this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, “total income” means taxable wages, dividends, interest, and pension income.

(c) The Legislative Analyst, in consultation with the Franchise Tax Board, shall conduct a study on the impact of the revised Form 540 2EZ and shall report to the Legislature, no later than January 1, 2008, on the following:

(1) The number of filers using the revised Form 540 2EZ.

(2) The effectiveness of the revised Form 540 2EZ in the simplification of tax preparation for the taxpayers eligible to use that form.

(3) The impact the revised Form 540 2EZ has on the Franchise Tax Board’s administration of the Personal Income Tax Law (Part 10 (commencing with Section
 17001)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19583.

The Franchise Tax Board shall, in preparing tax forms, include the following statement adjacent to the signature line of any income tax return required to be filed by a married individual:
 “It is unlawful to forge a spouse’s signature.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19584.

The Franchise Tax Board shall include a voter registration card with the Personal Income Tax filing forms that are mailed annually to California taxpayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 412, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19585.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the California resident income tax return to include a space for the taxpayer’s address of their principal residence and their county of principal residence.

(b) For purposes of this section, “county of principal residence” means the county in which the taxpayer has their principal residence on the date that the taxpayer filed their California resident income tax return.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “principal residence” is used in the same manner it is used in Section 121 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 230, Sec. 4.   (SB 592)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19586.

(a) (1) Beginning January 1, 2023, the Franchise Tax Board shall notify all potential eligible individuals of available paperless filing options offered through the Franchise Tax Board, including the CalFile program and free tax preparation services, including the Volunteer Income Tax Assistance program. Notifications shall contain information about available paperless filing options and information about the CalEITC.

(2) Notifications shall be in any form and manner, including electronic communication, determined by the Franchise Tax Board to incentivize potential eligible individuals to timely file federal and state tax returns.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board may coordinate the
 notifications with other government entities and nonprofit organizations to improve the efficacy and impact of the notifications.

(b) A negative inference shall not be drawn from a taxpayer’s decision not to file a return using the CalFile program or to file a return under a different method.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “CalEITC” means the California Earned Income Tax Credit allowed under Section 17052.

(2) “Potential eligible individual” means a taxpayer that was an eligible individual for purposes of the CalEITC in any of the three previous taxable years based on the information available to the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) On or before
 January 1, 2026, the Franchise Tax Board shall submit, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, a report to the Legislature that contains all of the following information organized by taxable year for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2025:

(1) The cost to administer and implement the notification requirement under this section.

(2) The total number of tax returns filed using paperless filing options offered through the Franchise Tax Board, including the CalFile program.

(3) An analysis of the discernible efficacy and impact of the notification required under this section.

(4) The number of tax returns filed using paperless filing options offered through the Franchise Tax Board that claimed the
 CalEITC.

(5) The estimated cost savings potential eligible individuals realized by using paperless filing options offered through the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 210.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Tax Service Fees [19590. - 19592.]

19590.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In addition to standard services that the Franchise Tax Board provides to all taxpayers and the public, the board also, upon request, provides specialized taxpayer services to individuals and entities.

(b) The provision of specialized taxpayer services imposes additional costs on the agency which are borne by all taxpayers.

(c) The full cost of administering specialized taxpayer services should be paid by the individual or entity that requests and receives the specialized taxpayer services, rather than by all taxpayers.

(d) Establishing a specialized service fee is the most efficient and convenient way to recover the full costs of administering and providing specialized taxpayer services.

(e) The amount of the specialized service fee imposed on an individual or an entity pursuant to this article shall be reasonably related to the actual costs incurred by the board to provide the specialized taxpayer service.

(f) The revenues derived from the fees imposed pursuant to this article are not the proceeds of taxes within the meaning Section 3 of Article XIIIA
 of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 10.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19591.

(a) Specialized tax services fees shall be imposed upon the following services provided by the board:

(1) Installment payment programs.

(2) Expedited services for:

(A) Corporation revivor requests.

(B) Tax-exempt status requests.

(C) Limited partnership revival confirmation letter requests.

(b) (1) For periods on or after the effective date of this section and prior to January 1, 2006, the Franchise Tax Board shall publish by notice a schedule of specialized tax services fees to be imposed, which notice shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The amounts of these fees under this paragraph shall be calculated in the same general manner as required under paragraph (2).

(2) Commencing on January 1, 2006, the amount of the specialized tax services fees shall be established by the board through regulations adopted pursuant to
 Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and shall be established in the manner and in the amounts necessary to reimburse the board for the costs of administering the specialized services, including the board’s direct and indirect costs for providing specialized tax services.

(3) For periods on or after the effective date of this section, and prior to January 1, 2011, the amount of the specialized tax service fee for limited partnership revival confirmation letter requests shall be one hundred dollars ($100). Commencing on January 1, 2011, the specialized tax service fee for limited partnership revival confirmation letter requests shall be calculated in the same general manner as required under paragraph (2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 239, Sec. 5.   (AB 672)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19592.

All fees received by the Franchise Tax Board under this article shall be treated as reimbursement for the board’s costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 10.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Disposition of Proceeds [19601. - 19611.]



  ARTICLE 1. Transfers to General Fund [19601. - 19607.]

19601.

The Franchise Tax Board shall transmit promptly to the Treasurer all moneys and remittances received by it under this part. It shall at the same time furnish copies of the schedules covering the transmittals to the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19602.

Except for amounts collected or accrued under Sections 17935, 17941, 17948, 19532, and 19561, and revenues deposited pursuant to Section 19602.5, all moneys and remittances received by the Franchise Tax Board as amounts imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), and related penalties, additions to tax, and interest imposed under this part, shall be deposited, after clearance of remittances, in the State Treasury and
 credited to the Personal Income Tax Fund.

(History: Amended November 2, 2004, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 13.   Operative January 1, 2005, pursuant to Sec. 16 of Prop. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

19602.5.

(a) There is in the State Treasury the Behavioral Health Services (BHS) Fund. The estimated revenue from the additional tax imposed under Section 17043 for the applicable fiscal year, as determined under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), shall be deposited to the BHS Fund on a monthly basis, subject to an annual adjustment as described in this section.

(b) (1) Each fiscal year, the Controller shall deposit on a monthly basis in the BHS Fund an amount equal to the applicable percentage of net personal income tax receipts as defined in paragraph (4).

(2) The
 applicable percentage referred to in paragraph (1) shall be 1.76 percent.

(3) Monthly deposits to the BHS Fund pursuant to this subdivision are subject to suspension pursuant to subdivision (f).

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “net personal income tax receipts” refers to amounts received by the Franchise Tax Board and the Employment Development Department under the Personal Income Tax Law, as reported by the Franchise Tax Board to the Department of Finance pursuant to law, regulation, procedure, and practice (commonly referred to as the “102 Report”) in effect on the effective date of the act establishing this section.

(c) No later than March 1, 2006, and each March 1 thereafter, the Department of Finance, in
 consultation with the Franchise Tax Board, shall determine the annual adjustment amount for the following fiscal year.

(1) The “annual adjustment amount” for a fiscal year shall be an amount equal to the amount determined by subtracting the “revenue adjustment amount” for the applicable revenue adjustment fiscal year, as determined by the Franchise Tax Board under paragraph (3), from the “tax liability adjustment amount” for applicable tax liability adjustment tax year, as determined by the Franchise Tax Board under paragraph (2).

(2) (A) (i) The “tax liability adjustment amount” for a tax year is equal to the amount determined by subtracting the estimated tax liability increase from the additional tax imposed under Section 17043 for
 the applicable year under subparagraph (B) from the amount of the actual tax liability increase from the additional tax imposed under Section 17043 for the applicable tax year, based on the returns filed for that tax year.

(ii) For purposes of the determinations required under this paragraph, actual tax liability increase from the additional tax means the increase in tax liability resulting from the tax of 1 percent imposed under Section 17043 as reflected on the original returns filed by October 15 of the year after the close of the applicable tax year.

(iii) The applicable tax year referred to in this paragraph means the 12-calendar month taxable year beginning on January 1 of the year that is two years before the beginning of the fiscal year for which an annual adjustment
 amount is calculated.

(B) The “estimated tax liability increase from the additional tax” for each tax year shall be determined by applying an annual growth rate of 7 percent to the “estimated tax liability increase from additional tax” of the immediately preceding tax year.

(3) (A) The “revenue adjustment amount” is equal to the amount determined by subtracting the “estimated revenue from the additional tax” for the applicable fiscal year, as determined under subparagraph (B), from the actual amount transferred for the applicable fiscal year.

(B) (i) The “estimated revenue from the additional tax” for each applicable fiscal year shall be determined by applying an annual growth rate
 of 7 percent to the “estimated revenue from the additional tax” of the immediately preceding applicable fiscal year.

(ii) The applicable fiscal year referred to in this paragraph means the fiscal year that is two years before the fiscal year for which an annual adjustment amount is calculated.

(d) The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature and the Controller of the results of the determinations required under subdivision (c) no later than 10 business days after the determinations are final.

(e) If the annual adjustment amount for a fiscal year is a positive number, the Controller shall transfer that amount from the General Fund to the BHS Fund on July 1 of that fiscal year.

(f) If the annual adjustment amount for a fiscal year is a negative number, the Controller shall suspend monthly transfers to the BHS Fund for that fiscal year, as otherwise required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), until the total amount of suspended deposits for that fiscal year equals the amount of the negative annual adjustment amount for that fiscal year.

(g) To the extent that there are moneys remaining in the Mental
 Health Services Fund on the date this section becomes operative, those moneys shall be transferred to the Behavioral Health Services Fund. Amounts owed or encumbered at the time of transfer shall be used in the manner required by the MHSA. Any funds not owed or encumbered by the MHSA may be used in the same manner as any other moneys in the BHS Fund.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 8.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19603.

The balance of the moneys in the Personal Income Tax Fund shall, upon order of the Controller, be drawn therefrom for the purpose of making refunds under this part or be transferred to the General Fund. All undelivered refund warrants shall be redeposited in the Personal Income Tax Fund upon receipt by the Controller.
